Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
SMALL BUSINESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

[§342B-61] Small business assistance
program. (a) The director shall establish within the department a small
business assistance program to provide technical support and environmental
compliance information to those small business stationary sources subject to
the provisions of this chapter. The small business assistance program shall:

(1) Develop, collect, and coordinate information
concerning compliance methods and technologies for small business stationary
sources;

(2) Assist small business stationary sources with air
pollution prevention and accidental release detection and prevention, including
providing information concerning alternative technologies, process changes,
products, and methods of operation that help reduce air pollution;

(3) Assist small business stationary sources in
determining applicable requirements and in obtaining permits pursuant to this
chapter in a timely and efficient manner;

(4) Assure that small business stationary sources receive
in a timely manner notice of their rights and of any applicable rules or
standards proposed or adopted pursuant to this chapter;

(5) Inform small business stationary sources of their
obligations pursuant to this chapter;

(6) Develop procedures for referring small business
stationary sources to qualified consultants in evaluating the operations of
such sources and in determining compliance with this chapter; and

(7) Develop procedures to consider requests from
small business stationary sources for modification of:

(A) Any work practice or technological
compliance methods; or

(B) The milestones for implementing such work
practice or compliance method;

based on the technological and financial
capability of any such small business stationary source. No modification may
be granted unless it is in compliance with the applicable requirements of this
chapter and the Clean Air Act.

(b) The director, upon petition by a small
business stationary source, after notice and opportunity for public comment, may
include as a small business stationary source for purposes of this chapter any
stationary source which does not meet the criteria for items (3), (4), or (5)
of the definition of "small business stationary source" provided the
stationary source does not emit more than one hundred tons per year of all
regulated air pollutants.

(c) The director, in consultation with the
administrator and the administrator of the federal Small Business
Administration and after providing notice and opportunity for public comment,
may exclude from the definition of "small business stationary source"
any category or subcategory of sources that the administrator or the director
determines to have sufficient technical and financial capabilities to meet the
requirements of this chapter without the application of this part. [L 1992, c
240, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next